Hawaii statutes.
[§708-8252] Arson in the second degree.
(1) A person commits the offense of arson in the second degree if the person
intentionally or knowingly sets fire to or causes to be burned property and:

(a) Recklessly places another person in danger of
death or bodily injury; or

(b) Knowingly or recklessly damages the property of
another, without the other's consent, in an amount exceeding $1,500.

(2) Arson in the second degree is a class B
felony. [L 2006, c 181, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next